test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bierdnes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bierdnes: # N_CONTR_ESA (no CGrad, but with umlaut)
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Nom: bierdnes
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Gen: bärdná
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Acc: bärdnáv
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Ill: bärdnáj
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Ine: bärdnán
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Ela: [bärdnást, bärdnás]
    bierdnes+N+Sg+Com: bärdnájn
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Nom: bärdná
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Gen: bärdnáj
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Acc: bärdnájd
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Ill: bärdnájda
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Ine: bärdnájn
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Ela: [bärdnájst, bärdnájs]
    bierdnes+N+Pl+Com: [bärdnáj, bärdnájgum]
#    bierdnes+N+Ess: bärdnán
#    bierdnes+N+Ess: bierdnán	#not sure what grade (here: umlaut) should be in ESS
